Illinois, session 104th, SB1522.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education for grants, 7contracts, and administrative expenses under the federal Farm 8to School State Formula Grant. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.